California, session 20252026, AB2180.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53751.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:53751.5. (a) For any fee or charge adopted under Section 6 of Article XIII D of the California Constitution, “the proportional cost of the service attributable to the parcel” may be demonstrated by any method that reasonably allocates the ascertainable cost of providing service to all parcels. That allocation shall be substantiated by historic, existing, estimated, or projected data that reasonably captures the cost of the service to be provided.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when imposing a fee or charge for water or sewer service, an agency is not required to provide an exact measure of the cost of the service at each parcel and an agency may impose uniform or tiered rates to parcel or customer classes that are defined based on common characteristics indicative of likely water or sewer use, including, but not limited to, the nature and size of improvements to a parcel, land use, the nature or number of plumbing fixtures, meter size, or peak use characteristics.(c) (1) When imposing a tiered rate for water service, an agency may substantiate the proportional cost of the service within each tier by using any reasonable basis for allocating costs attributed to the tier, including, but not limited to, the following:(A) The cost of water from various sources.(B) Facilities operation, maintenance, or construction costs.(C) Contribution to systemwide peak demand projections.(D) Costs that an agency incurs as a result of the use of water at various tiers or to implement water conservation or demand management measures, or incremental costs, as that term is used in Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 370) of Division 1 of the Water Code.(2) An agency is not required to have a cost-based, or any other, justification for establishing any tier breakpoint. For purposes of this paragraph, “tier breakpoint” means the point where a customer leaves one tier and enters another tier.(3) An agency has discretion to determine the costs allocated to each tier, provided that the rate assigned to each tier does not exceed the proportional cost of service reasonably allocated to parcels subject to that tier.(d) This section shall not apply to fees for water connections or sewer connections, or capacity charges, subject to Section 66013.